Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5862.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18.9 of the General Laws entitled "Benefit Determination and
Utilization Review Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.9-16. Medically necessary treatment -- Justification for denial.
Any healthcare service or procedure authorized by a provider to a patient shall create a
presumption that the healthcare service or procedure is medically necessary and it shall be the duty
of the insurance company to provide justification for any denial of such healthcare service or
procedure.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002314
========